Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Article 7. Registration of Commercial Fishermen

§ 28.2-240.
Repealed by Acts 1993, c. 219.

Cross references.

As to present provisions relating to noncommercial gill net licenses, see §§

28.2-226.1

and

28.2-226.2

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

28.2-240

, relating to noncommercial gill net licenses, was enacted by Acts 1992, cc. 493, 503.

§ 28.2-241.
Registration of commercial fishermen required; exemption; penalty.

On and after January 1, 1993, holders of gear licenses, except those issued pursuant to §

28.2-402

, issued January 1, 1992, through December 31, 1992, shall register as commercial fishermen as provided for in regulation.

[Repealed.]

On and after January 1, 1993, fishermen not registered as commercial fishermen but who desire to sell their catch shall apply to the Commission for registration as commercial fishermen. The effective date of status as a commercial fisherman shall be two years from the date the application is approved by the Commission. A person whose registration as a commercial fisherman is not effective shall not sell, trade, or barter his catch or give his catch to another in order that it may be sold, traded, or bartered. The Commission shall grant a preference, on a one-in, one-out basis, for an exemption from the two-year waiting period for an immediate family member or documented employee of a commercial fisherman who is retiring from the commercial fishery.

For purposes of this section and §§

28.2-242

,

28.2-243

, and

28.2-244

, “commercial fisherman” means any person who fishes in tidal waters using any gear and who sells, trades, or barters his catch or gives his catch to another in order that it may be sold, traded, or bartered. The Commission shall provide, by regulation, for exemptions from the definition of “commercial fisherman” those persons who independently sell, trade, or barter minnows and who are not part of, hired by, or engaged in a continuing business enterprise as may be defined by the Commission. Such regulation may include, but is not limited to, limits on the quantity of minnows that may be sold, traded, or bartered by a person that may be exempted from the definition of commercial fisherman.

The cost of registration as a commercial fisherman shall be $150 annually, due no later than the effective date of registration; however, the cost of registration for a person 70 years of age or older shall be $75. All fees collected from the registration of commercial fishermen shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the Marine Fishing Improvement Fund as established in §

28.2-208

. The Commission may subsequently revise the cost of licenses in this section pursuant to §

28.2-201

.

Registrations of commercial fishermen shall not be transferable.

Whenever a court finds that a defendant has violated any of the provisions of this section, the court shall assess a civil penalty of $500. All civil penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be paid into the Marine Fishing Improvement Fund as established in §

28.2-208

.

Only commercial fishermen with valid registrations may purchase licenses pursuant to §§

28.2-301

,

28.2-501

, and

28.2-702

.

Persons who have obtained a recreational gear license pursuant to §

28.2-226.1

or

28.2-302.1

are exempt from the provisions of this section.

History.

1992, cc. 493, 503; 1993, c. 219; 1994, c. 121; 1996, c. 277; 2009, c. 9; 2017, c. 339.

Cross references.

As to liability for marine tourism activity, see Chapter 11.1 (§

28.2-1105

et seq.) of Title 28.2.

As to boating safety education requirements, see §

29.1-735.2

.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added the last sentence in subsection E.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 339 added last sentence in subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

§ 28.2-242.
Report of harvest required.

All harvests shall be reported by either commercial fishermen, licensed buyers, or self marketers in the manner and form prescribed by the Commission.

History.

1992, cc. 493, 503; 1993, c. 237.

§ 28.2-243.
Commission to promulgate regulations.

The Commission shall promulgate regulations governing the registration of commercial fishermen.
The regulations shall include (i) the procedure and manner for application for registration as a commercial fisherman, (ii) the manner and form of mandatory harvest reports by commercial fishermen, and (iii) exceptions to the delay requirements pursuant to subsection C of §

28.2-241

based on scientific, economic, biological, sociological and hardship factors.

History.

1992, cc. 493, 503.

§ 28.2-244.
Purchase of shellfish or finfish; penalty.

A person shall not purchase shellfish or finfish from any fisherman who is known by such person to have not registered as a commercial fisherman as required by §

28.2-241

. Whenever a court finds that a defendant has violated the provisions of this section, the court shall assess a civil penalty of $500. All civil penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be paid into the Marine Fishing Improvement Fund as established in §

28.2-208

.

History.

1992, cc. 493, 503.